Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.080

Deputy and assistant directors.

The director may appoint such deputy directors and assistant directors as shall be needed to administer the office of financial management. The officers appointed under this section and exempt from the provisions of the state civil service law by the terms of RCW 41.06.075, shall be paid salaries to be fixed by the governor in accordance with the procedure established by law for the fixing of salaries for officers exempt from the operation of the state civil service law.

[ 1979 c 151 s 113; 1969 ex.s. c 239 s 6.]